Missouri, session 2026, SB1222.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 188, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 188.140, to read as
follows:
188.140. 1. As used in this section, the term "pro-
life individual or organization", shall mean any individual
or any nonprofit domestic firm, partnership, association, or
corporation, including those which operate under the
standards of section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986 as amended, where the interests or purposes of such
individual or organization include, but shall not be limited
to, protecting the sanctity of life or defending the right
to life of all humans, born and unborn.
2. Any pro-life individual or organization may
intervene in any action in which a provision of the
Constitution of Missouri, any Missouri statute, or any
Missouri rule that involves the regulation of abortion or
where the rights of an unborn child is at issue. The first
pro-life individual or organization to file for intervention
shall represent the rights of the unborn child in such
proceeding and shall have the right to file such pleading
necessary on behalf of the unborn child. Any other pro-life

SB 1222 2
individuals or organizations may submit amicus curiae briefs
on their own behalf or on behalf of the unborn child.
✓